Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 5
SHERIFF

Cross references:

For sheriffs' fees, see § 30-1-104.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

ounty Sheriffs in

C

olorado: Beyond the Myth", see 38 Colo. Law. 19 (Feb. 2009).

30-10-501. Sheriff - election - bond - insurance.

A sheriff shall be elected in each county for the term of four years and, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before entering upon the duties of office, shall execute to the people of the state of Colorado a bond, with at least three sufficient sureties, in the sum of not less than five thousand nor more than twenty thousand dollars, which the board of county commissioners, or, if it is not in session, the county clerk and recorder, subject to the approval of such board at its next session thereafter, shall specify and approve. When approved, the bond shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder, and no person shall be received as surety who is not worth at least two thousand dollars over and above the surety's just debts.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage in an amount not less than ten thousand dollars on behalf of the sheriff to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the sheriff while in office.

Source:

G.L.

§ 489.

G.S.

§ 593.

R.S. 08:

§ 1273.

C.L.

§ 8748.

CSA:

C. 45, § 95.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-1.

L. 56:

p. 128, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 560, § 15, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For the election of county officers, see § 8 of art. XIV, Colo. Const., and § 1-4-206; for bonds executed by surety companies, see § 10-4-301; for the approval of official bonds, see § 24-13-116; for bonds of county officers, see § 30-10-110.

30-10-501.5. Qualifications.

No person is eligible for nomination, election, or appointment to the office of sheriff unless the person:

Is a citizen of the United States, is a citizen of the state of Colorado, and is a resident of the county to which the person is to be appointed or elected;

Possesses a high school diploma or its equivalent or a college degree;

Has had a complete set of fingerprints taken by a qualified law enforcement agency and has submitted a receipt evidencing the fingerprinting at the time of filing his or her written acceptance pursuant to section 1-4-601 (3), 1-4-906, or part 10 of article 4 of title 1, or at the time of filing an affidavit of intent pursuant to section 1-4-1101, as applicable. The law enforcement agency shall forward the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation. The bureau shall utilize the fingerprints, its files and records, and those of the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of determining whether the person has ever been convicted of or pleaded guilty or entered a plea of nolo contendere to any felony charge under federal or state laws. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall notify the county clerk and recorder of the county for which the person is a candidate of the results of the fingerprint analysis. If a conviction or plea is disclosed, the person is unqualified for the office of sheriff, unless pardoned. The results of the fingerprint analysis are confidential; except that the county clerk and recorder may divulge whether the person is qualified or unqualified for the office of sheriff.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1444, § 1, effective April 5; (1)(c) and IP(2) amended, p. 303, § 4, effective June 8.

L. 95:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1106, § 46, effective May 31.

L. 97:

Entire section R&RE, p. 925, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 963, § 11, effective August 9.

30-10-501.6. Training.

Every person elected or appointed to the office of sheriff for the first time shall:

Attend a minimum of eighty clock hours at a new sheriff training course developed and facilitated either by the county sheriffs of Colorado, incorporated, or any other training resource agency approved by the Colorado peace officers standards and training board, the first time such training course is given after the person's election or appointment. The Colorado peace officers standards and training board shall have discretion to allow the substitution of any combination of education, experience, and training deemed by the board to be equivalent to such new sheriff training course.

Obtain basic peace officer certification within one year of taking office. An extension may be granted by the Colorado peace officers standards and training board of up to one year to obtain such certification upon just cause shown. The Colorado peace officers standards and training board shall issue written findings of fact supporting such an extension.

Every sheriff must possess basic peace officer certification and shall undergo at least the number of clock hours of in-service training required for all certified peace officers by the Colorado peace officers standards and training board, but in no case less than twenty hours. Such training shall be provided either by the county sheriffs of Colorado, incorporated, or any other training resource agency approved by the Colorado peace officers standards and training board, every year during such sheriff's term. The Colorado peace officers standards and training board shall have discretion to waive in-service training upon presentation of evidence by the sheriff demonstrating just cause for noncompletion of such training. The Colorado peace officers standards and training board shall have discretion to allow the substitution of any combination of education, experience, and training deemed by the board to be equivalent to such in-service training.

The county shall only pay all reasonable costs and expenses of new sheriff and in-service training.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 926, § 2, effective May 21.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (HB 17-1050), ch. 30, p. 86, § 1, effective August 9.

30-10-501.7. Enforcement.

In the event a sheriff fails to comply with the requirements set forth in section 30-10-501.6, such sheriff's pay must be suspended by the board of county commissioners in accordance with subsection (2) of this section. Such sheriff's pay shall be reinstated with back pay by the board of county commissioners upon completion of said requirements in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

In any circumstances set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the Colorado peace officers standards and training board shall notify the board of county commissioners of the sheriff's failure to comply with the requirements of said subsection (1) and that state law requires the county commissioners to immediately suspend such sheriff's pay until the requirements of section 30-10-501.6 have been complied with. After the sheriff's compliance with the provisions of section 30-10-501.6, the Colorado peace officers standards and training board shall immediately notify the board of county commissioners of the sheriff's compliance and that state law requires the board of county commissioners to reinstate such sheriff's pay and provide him or her any back pay.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 926, § 2, effective May 21.

30-10-502. Form of bond.

If a sheriff executes a bond pursuant to section 30-10-501 (1), the condition of the bond shall be in substance as follows: "Whereas, the above bounden .......... was elected to the office of sheriff of the county of .........., on the .......... day of ..........; Now, the condition of this obligation is such that if the said ................ shall well and faithfully perform and execute the duties of the office of sheriff of said county of .......... while in office by virtue of said election without fraud, deceit, or oppression, shall pay over all moneys that may come into the hands of the sheriff, and shall deliver to the sheriff's successor in office all writs, papers, and other things pertaining to the office that may be so required by law, then the above obligations shall be void, otherwise to be and remain in full force and effect."

Source:

G.L.

§ 490.

G.S.

§ 594.

R.S. 08:

§ 1274.

C.L.

§ 8749.

CSA:

C. 45, § 96.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-2.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 560, § 16, effective August 11.

30-10-503. Sheriff assumes duties - when.

When the term of office of any sheriff expires and the sheriff-elect qualifies according to law, the county clerk and recorder shall issue a notice setting forth that said sheriff-elect has qualified according to law, which notice shall be served by the new sheriff on the former sheriff, whereupon such former sheriff shall immediately transfer and deliver to the new sheriff all the writs, processes, books, and papers belonging to the office, except as otherwise excepted in this part 5, and also the possession of the courthouse and jail of the county, and shall take from the new sheriff a receipt specifying the papers so delivered over and the prisoners in custody, if any, which receipt shall be sufficient indemnity to the person taking the same.

Source:

G.L.

§ 498.

G.S.

§ 602.

R.S. 08:

§ 1285.

C.L.

§ 8760.

CSA:

C. 45, § 107.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-3.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 561, § 17, effective August 11.

30-10-504. Undersheriff - duties - vacancy.

The sheriff of each county, as soon as may be after entering upon the duties of his office, shall appoint some proper person undersheriff of said county, who shall also be a general deputy, to serve during the pleasure of the sheriff. As often as a vacancy occurs in the office of such undersheriff, or he becomes incapable of executing the same, another shall in like manner be appointed in his place.

Source:

G.L.

§ 491.

G.S.

§ 595.

R.S. 08:

§ 1275.

C.L.

§ 8750.

CSA:

C. 45, § 97.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-9.

Cross references:

For substitute officers having the same powers and compensation, see § 30-10-106.

30-10-505. Vacancy in office - powers of undersheriff.

When a vacancy occurs in the office of sheriff of any county, the undersheriff of such county shall in all things execute the office of sheriff until a sheriff is appointed or elected and qualified. Any default or misfeasance in office of such undersheriff in the meantime, as well as before such vacancy, shall be deemed to be a breach of the condition of the bond given by the sheriff who appointed the undersheriff or the insurance policy purchased by the county on the sheriff's behalf.

Source:

G.L.

§ 492.

G.S.

§ 596.

R.S. 08:

§ 1276.

C.L.

§ 8751.

CSA:

C. 45, § 98.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-4.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 561, § 18, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For powers, duties, and compensation of person acting as sheriff when the office is vacant, see §§ 30-10-106, 30-10-518, and 30-10-604.

30-10-506. Deputies.

Each sheriff may appoint as many deputies as the sheriff may think proper and may revoke such appointments at will; except that a sheriff shall adopt personnel policies, including policies for the review of revocation of appointments. Before revoking an appointment of a deputy, the sheriff shall notify the deputy of the reason for the proposed revocation and shall give the deputy an opportunity to be heard by the sheriff. Persons may also be deputized by the sheriff or undersheriff in writing to do particular acts.

Source:

G.L.

§ 493.

G.S.

§ 597.

R.S. 08:

§ 1277.

C.L.

§ 8752.

CSA:

C. 45, § 99.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-5.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 133, § 1, effective August 7.

30-10-507. Liability of sheriff for deputy. (Repealed)

Source:

G.L.

§ 501.

G.S.

§ 605.

R.S. 08:

§ 1288.

C.L.

§ 8763.

CSA:

C. 45, § 110.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-6.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 133, § 2, effective August 7.

30-10-508. Executor of sheriff liable. (Repealed)

Source:

G.L.

§ 502.

G.S.

§ 606.

R.S. 08:

§ 1289.

C.L.

§ 8764.

CSA:

C. 45, § 111.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-7.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 134, § 3, effective August 7.

30-10-509. Liability of sheriff for neglect.

When any sheriff neglects to make due return of any writ of process delivered to the sheriff to be executed, or is guilty of any default or misconduct in relation thereto, the sheriff is liable to fine or attachment or both, at the discretion of the court, subject to appeal. The fine, however, shall not exceed two hundred dollars.

Source:

G.L.

§ 505.

G.S.

§ 609.

R.S. 08:

§ 1292.

C.L.

§ 8767.

CSA:

C. 45, § 114.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-8.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 134, § 4, effective August 7.

30-10-510. Appointment and revocation. (Repealed)

Source:

G.L.

§ 494.

G.S.

§ 598.

R.S. 08:

§ 1278.

C.L.

§ 8753.

CSA:

C. 45, § 100.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-10.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 134, § 5, effective August 7.

30-10-511. Sheriff custodian of jail.

Except as provided in section 16-11-308.5, C.R.S., the sheriff shall have charge and custody of the jails of the county, and of the prisoners in the jails, and shall supervise them himself or herself or through a deputy or jailer.

Source:

G.L.

§ 495.

G.S.

§ 599.

R.S. 08:

§ 1279.

C.L.

§ 8754.

CSA:

C. 45, § 101.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-11.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 677, § 4, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 711, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 134, § 6, effective August 7.

30-10-512. Sheriff to act as fire warden.

Subject to the provisions of the community wildfire protection plan prepared by the county in accordance with section 30-15-401.7, the sheriff of every county, in addition to other duties, shall act as fire warden of his or her respective county and is responsible for the coordination of fire suppression efforts in case of prairie, forest, or wildland fires or wildfires occurring in the unincorporated area of the county outside the boundaries of a fire protection district or that exceed the capabilities of the fire protection district to control or extinguish.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 176, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1280.

C.L.

§ 8755.

CSA:

C. 45, § 102.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-12.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-020), ch. 189, p. 829, § 4, effective April 30; entire section amended, (SB 09-001), ch. 30, p. 128, § 4, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 09-001 and Senate Bill 09-020 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For duty of sheriff to report fires, see § 23-31-204.

30-10-513. Duties of sheriff - coordination of fire suppression efforts for forest, prairie, or wildland fire - expenses.

Subject to the provisions of the community wildfire protection plan prepared by the county in accordance with section 30-15-401.7, it is the duty of the sheriff to assume the responsibility for coordinating fire suppression efforts in case of any prairie, forest, or wildland fire or wildfire occurring in the unincorporated area of the county outside the boundaries of a fire protection district or that exceed the capabilities of the fire protection district to control or extinguish.

In the case of a prairie, forest, or wildland fire occurring within the boundaries of one or more fire protection districts that does not exceed the capabilities of the fire protection district to control or extinguish, the sheriff may assist the chief of the fire protection district in controlling or extinguishing such fire, and, in connection with such assistance, the sheriff may solicit such additional assistance from such persons as the sheriff and the fire chief deem necessary. The sheriff may assume command of such incidents with the concurrence of the fire chief.

In the case of a prairie, forest, or wildland fire that exceeds the capabilities of the fire protection district to control or extinguish and that requires mutual aid and outside resources, the sheriff shall appoint a local incident management team to provide the command and control infrastructure required to manage the fire. The sheriff shall assume financial responsibility for fire fighting efforts on behalf of the county and the authority for the ordering and monitoring of resources.

When a wildfire exceeds the capability of the county to control or extinguish, the sheriff shall be responsible for seeking the assistance of the state by requesting assistance from the division of fire prevention and control in the department of public safety. The sheriff and the director of the division of fire prevention and control shall enter into an agreement concerning the transfer of authority and responsibility for fire suppression and the retention of responsibilities under a unified command structure.

The director of the division of fire prevention and control may assume any duty or responsibility given to the sheriff under this section with the concurrence of the sheriff.

The board of county commissioners of any county may allow the sheriff, undersheriffs, deputies, municipal or county fire departments, fire protection districts, fire authorities, and such other persons as may be called upon to assist in controlling or extinguishing a prairie, forest, or wildland fire such compensation and reimbursement for other expenses necessarily incurred as the board deems just.

The board of county commissioners of any county may allow a fire department, fire protection district, or volunteer fire department compensation and reimbursement from a county funding source for other expenses necessarily incurred in controlling or extinguishing a prairie, forest, or wildland fire within the jurisdiction or boundaries of the fire department, fire protection district, or volunteer fire department if the circumstances set forth in section 24-33.5-1220 (6)(a)(I), (6)(a)(II), and (6)(a)(III) are met, as the board deems just.

The board of county commissioners of any county in the state may make such appropriation as it may deem proper for the purpose of controlling fires in its county. The board of county commissioners is authorized to levy a special tax subject to approval of the voters upon every dollar of valuation of assessment of the taxable property within the county for the purpose of creating a fund that shall be appropriated, after consultation with representatives of fire departments, fire protection districts, and fire authorities in the county, to prevent, control, or extinguish such fires anywhere in the county and to fix the rate of levy.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 176, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1281.

C.L.

§ 8756.

CSA:

C. 45, § 103.

L. 45:

p. 299, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-13.

L. 65:

p. 925, § 4.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 673, § 1, effective May 2.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1303, § 6, effective May 26.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-105), ch. 190, p. 831, § 1, effective April 30; entire section R&RE, (SB 09-020), ch. 189, p. 829, § 5, effective April 30; entire section amended, (SB 09-001), ch. 30, p. 128, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2119, § 163, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1) (d) and (2) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1694, § 97, effective August 7.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (SB 22-002), ch. 339, p. 2442, § 6, effective June 3.

30-10-513.5. Authority of sheriff relating to fires within unincorporated areas of county - liability for expenses.

The sheriff of any county may request assistance from a fire protection district or municipality in controlling or extinguishing a fire occurring on private property if, in the judgment of such sheriff, the fire constitutes a danger to the health and safety of the public or a risk of serious damage to property. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any fire protection district or municipality assisting in controlling or extinguishing such fire is entitled to reimbursement from the property owner on whose property the fire occurred or from the party responsible for the occurrence of such fire for the reasonable and documented costs resulting from such assistance. The fire protection district or municipality may recover the costs incurred in a civil action against the property owner or the responsible party or may, by resolution of its board or governing body adopted at a public hearing after notice to the affected parties, certify to the county treasurer the amount of any costs incurred that remains uncollected after diligent effort for a period greater than one hundred eighty days. Such certification is subject to the appeal process and all other remedies, if any, provided in the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. If the fire protection district or municipality prevails, the amount certified shall be collected by the treasurer in the same manner as taxes are authorized to be collected pursuant to section

39-10-107

, C.R.S. To defray the costs of collection, the treasurer shall be authorized to charge an amount equal to ten percent of the amount collected.

For purposes of this subsection (1), "fire occurring on private property" means:

A fire occurring on property not located within a fire protection district or municipality providing fire protection services.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1253, § 1, effective July 1, 1993.)

This section does not prohibit a county from reimbursing a fire protection district, fire department, or volunteer fire department for expenses necessarily incurred in controlling or extinguishing a prairie, forest, or wildland fire from a county funding source in accordance with section

30-10-513 (3)(b)

.

An owner of private property who has contracted with a fire protection district for fire protection services shall advise the sheriff of such contract and any fire protection districts with which such district has mutual aid agreements. In the event that a fire occurs on such property, the sheriff shall make a reasonable attempt to secure the services from such district. If the district does not respond, he shall make a reasonable attempt to secure such services from any of the districts with which such district has mutual aid agreements. If services cannot be secured, the sheriff, in his discretion, may attempt to secure fire protection services from any other district or municipality, and, if services are provided, the owner of the property or the party responsible for the fire shall be liable for the costs incurred by such district or municipality. Such costs may be assessed and collected in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section.

No sheriff shall be held liable for failure to secure fire protection services as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) unless the failure was due to willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith.

Any property owner who desires to conduct a controlled burn of a structure or building located on such property shall notify the county sheriff of the date when such controlled burn will be conducted. Any property owner providing such notification shall not be liable for any costs under this section resulting from the response by a fire protection district or municipality to such controlled burn due to any person informing or warning such district or municipality of the fire arising from such burn.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1279, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 93:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 1253, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1304, § 7, effective May 26.

L. 2022:

(1)(c) added, (SB 22-002), ch. 339, p. 2442, § 7, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2000 act amending subsection (1)(a), see section 7 of chapter 272, Session Laws of Colorado 2000.

30-10-514. Sheriff to transport prisoners.

It is the duty of any sheriff transporting prisoners to a correctional facility, as defined in section 17-1-102, C.R.S., or other place of confinement to convey to such facility or other place of confinement at one time all prisoners who may have been convicted and sentenced and who are ready for such transportation. If any sheriff fails or neglects to carry out the provisions of this section, the boards of county commissioners may disallow any such sheriff's bill for such extra trips as in their discretion are unnecessary. This section shall not apply to the transportation of the insane.

Source:

L. 1897:

p. 256, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1282.

C.L.

§ 8757.

CSA:

C. 45, § 104.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-14.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 704, § 83, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For necessary expenses of and mileage allowance to sheriffs for transporting prisoners, see § 30-1-104 (1)(w).

30-10-515. Sheriff to execute writs - attend court.

The sheriff, in person or by his undersheriff or deputy, shall serve and execute, according to law, all processes, writs, precepts, and orders issued or made by lawful authority and to him directed, and shall serve the several courts of record held in his county.

Source:

G.L.

§ 496.

G.S.

§ 600.

R.S. 08:

§ 1283.

C.L.

§ 8758.

CSA:

C. 45, § 105.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-15.

Cross references:

For sheriff's duty to serve on tender of fee, see § 30-1-106.

30-10-516. Sheriffs to preserve peace - command aid.

It is the duty of the sheriffs, undersheriffs, and deputies to keep and preserve the peace in their respective counties, and to quiet and suppress all affrays, riots, and unlawful assemblies and insurrections. For that purpose, and for the service of process in civil or criminal cases, and in apprehending or securing any person for felony or breach of the peace, they, and every coroner, may call to their aid such person of their county as they may deem necessary.

Source:

G.L.

§ 497.

G.S.

§ 601.

R.S. 08:

§ 1284.

C.L.

§ 8759.

CSA:

C. 45, § 106.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-16.

L. 64:

p. 383, § 7.

Cross references:

For authority of a peace officer to command aid, see §§ 16-3-202 and 18-8-107.

30-10-517. Outgoing sheriff may proceed with writs.

Every sheriff going out of office at the expiration of the sheriff's term and having any order of fieri facias or fee bill that the sheriff has levied but not collected shall collect such execution or fee bill in the same manner as if the sheriff's term of office had not expired.

Source:

G.L.

§ 499.

G.S.

§ 603.

R.S. 08:

§ 1286.

C.L.

§ 8761.

CSA:

C. 45, § 108.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-17.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 561, § 19, effective August 11.

30-10-518. Coroner when acting as sheriff.

The provisions of sections 30-10-503 and 30-10-517 shall apply to all coroners when by virtue of the laws of the state they are required to perform the duties of sheriff.

Source:

G.L.

§ 500.

G.S.

§ 604.

R.S. 08:

§ 1287.

C.L.

§ 8762.

CSA:

C. 45, § 109.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-18.

30-10-519. Service on sheriff, made how.

Every paper required by law to be served on the sheriff may be served on him in person or left at his office during business hours.

Source:

G.L.

§ 503.

G.S.

§ 607.

R.S. 08:

§ 1290.

C.L.

§ 8765.

CSA:

C. 45, § 112.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-19.

30-10-520. Sheriff not to act as attorney.

No sheriff, undersheriff, or deputy shall appear or advise as attorney or counselor in any case in any court.

Source:

G.L.

§ 504.

G.S.

§ 608.

R.S. 08:

§ 1291.

C.L.

§ 8766.

CSA:

C. 45, § 113.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-20.

30-10-521. Illegal fees - penalty.

No sheriff shall directly or indirectly ask, demand, or receive for any service to be performed by him in the discharge of any of his official duties any greater fees than are allowed by law, on penalty of forfeiture of treble damages to the party aggrieved, and being fined in a sum not less than twenty-five dollars and not more than two hundred dollars.

Source:

G.L.

§ 506.

G.S.

§ 610.

R.S. 08:

§ 1293.

C.L.

§ 8768.

CSA:

C. 45, § 115.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-21.

30-10-522. Actions against sheriff - sureties liable - when.

Except in the case of a sheriff covered by insurance purchased pursuant to section 30-10-501 (2), in an action brought against a sheriff for an action done by virtue of the sheriff's office, if the sheriff gives notice thereof to the sureties on any bond of indemnity given by the sheriff, the judgment recovered therein shall be sufficient evidence of the sheriff's right to recover against such sureties, and the court, on motion, upon notice of five days, may order judgment to be entered against them for the amount so recovered, including costs.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 214, § 419.

Code 08:

§ 454.

Code 21:

§ 456.

Code 35:

§ 456.

CRS 53:

§ 35-5-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-5-22.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 561, § 20, effective August 11.

30-10-523. Sheriff - permits for concealed handguns.

The sheriff of each county and the official who has the duties of a sheriff in each city and county shall issue written permits to carry concealed handguns as provided in part 2 of article 12 of title 18, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1437, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 650, § 8, effective May 17.

30-10-524. Sheriff to provide identification cards to retired peace officers upon request - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Peace officer" means a certified peace officer described in section 16-2.5-102, C.R.S.

"Photographic identification" means a photographic identification that satisfies the description at 18 U.S.C. sec. 926c (d).

Except as described in subsection (3) of this section, on and after August 7, 2013, if a sheriff's office has a policy, on August 7, 2013, of issuing photographic identification to peace officers who have retired from the sheriff's office, and the sheriff's office discontinues said policy after August 7, 2013, the sheriff's office shall continue to provide such photographic identification to peace officers who have retired from the sheriff's office if:

The peace officer requests the identification;

The peace officer retired from the sheriff's office before the date upon which the sheriff's office discontinued the policy; and

The peace officer is a qualified retired law enforcement officer, as defined in 18 U.S.C. sec. 926c (c).

Before issuing or renewing a photographic identification to a retired law enforcement officer pursuant to this section, a law enforcement agency of the state shall complete a criminal background check of the officer through a search of the national instant criminal background check system created by the federal "Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act", Pub.L. 103-159, the relevant portion of which is codified at 18 U.S.C. sec. 922 (t), and a search of the state integrated criminal justice information system. If the background check indicates that the officer is prohibited from possessing a firearm by state or federal law, the law enforcement agency shall not issue the photographic identification.

The sheriff's office may charge a fee for issuing a photographic identification to a retired peace officer pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, which fee shall not exceed the direct and indirect costs assumed by the sheriff's office in issuing the photographic identification.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a sheriff's office shall not be required to issue a photographic identification to a particular peace officer if the sheriff elects not to do so.

If a sheriff's office denies a photographic identification to a retired peace officer who requests a photographic identification pursuant to this section, the sheriff's office shall provide the retired peace officer a written statement setting forth the reason for the denial.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1118), ch. 81, p. 258, § 3, effective August 7.

30-10-525. Disclosure of knowing misrepresentation by a peace officer required - disclosure waivers - reports - definitions.

Subject to the limitations of this section, a sheriff's office that employs, employed, or deputized on or after January 1, 2010, a peace officer who applies for employment with another Colorado law enforcement agency shall disclose to the hiring agency information, if available, indicating whether the peace officer's employment history included any instances in which the peace officer had a sustained violation for making a knowing misrepresentation:

In any testimony or affidavit relating to the arrest or prosecution of a person or to a civil case pertaining to the peace officer or to the peace officer's employment history; or

During the course of any internal investigation by a law enforcement agency, which investigation is related to the peace officer's alleged criminal conduct; official misconduct, as described in section 18-8-404 or 18-8-405, C.R.S.; or use of excessive force, regardless of whether the alleged criminal conduct, official misconduct, or use of excessive force occurred while the peace officer was on duty, off duty, or acting pursuant to a service contract to which the peace officer's employing agency is a party.

The disclosure described in subsection (1) of this section is required only upon the presentation of a written waiver to a sheriff's office, which waiver explicitly authorizes the sheriff's office to disclose the information described in said subsection (1), has been signed by the applicant peace officer, and identifies the Colorado law enforcement agency that is considering the applicant peace officer for employment. A sheriff's office that receives such a waiver shall provide the disclosure to the Colorado law enforcement agency that is considering the applicant peace officer for employment not more than seven days after such receipt.

A sheriff's office is not required to provide the disclosure described in subsection (1) of this section if the sheriff's office is prohibited from providing such disclosure pursuant to a binding nondisclosure agreement to which the sheriff's office is a party, which agreement was executed before August 5, 2015.

A sheriff's office shall notify the local district attorney whenever the sheriff's office determines there is a sustained finding that any peace officer of the sheriff's office has made a knowing misrepresentation:

In any testimony or affidavit relating to the arrest or prosecution of a person or to a civil case pertaining to the peace officer or to the peace officer's employment history; or

During the course of any internal investigation by a law enforcement agency, which investigation is related to the peace officer's alleged criminal conduct; official misconduct, as described in section 18-8-404 or 18-8-405, C.R.S.; or use of excessive force, regardless of whether the alleged criminal conduct, official misconduct, or use of excessive force occurred while the peace officer was on duty, off duty, or acting pursuant to a service contract to which the peace officer's employing agency is a party.

A sheriff's office shall provide the notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) not more than seven days after the sheriff's office determines there is a sustained finding that a peace officer of the sheriff's office has made a knowing misrepresentation, as described in said paragraph (a).

A sheriff's office is not liable for complying with the provisions of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, "state or local law enforcement agency" means:

The Colorado state patrol created pursuant to section 24-33.5-201, C.R.S.;

The Colorado bureau of investigation created pursuant to section 24-33.5-401, C.R.S.;

A county sheriff's office;

A municipal police department;

The division of parks and wildlife within the department of natural resources created pursuant to section 24-1-124, C.R.S.; or

A town marshal's office.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-218), ch. 209, p. 761, § 3, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 15-218, see section 1 of chapter 209, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

30-10-526. Sheriff office hiring - required use of waiver - definitions.

A sheriff's office shall require each candidate that it interviews for a peace officer position who has been employed by another law enforcement agency or governmental agency to execute a written waiver that explicitly authorizes each law enforcement agency or governmental agency that has employed the candidate to disclose the applicant's files, including internal affairs files, to the interviewing sheriff's agency and releases the interviewing sheriff's office and each law enforcement agency or governmental agency that employed the candidate from any liability related to the use and disclosure of the files. A law enforcement agency or governmental agency may disclose the applicant's files by either providing copies or allowing the sheriff's office to review the files at the law enforcement agency's office or governmental agency's office. A candidate who refuses to execute the waiver shall not be considered for employment by the sheriff's office. The sheriff's office interviewing the candidate shall, at least twenty-one days prior to making the hiring decision, submit the waiver to each law enforcement agency or governmental agency that has employed the candidate. A state or local law enforcement agency or governmental agency that receives such a waiver shall provide the disclosure to the sheriff's office that is interviewing the candidate not more than twenty-one days after such receipt.

A state or local law enforcement agency is not required to provide the disclosures described in subsection (1) of this section if the agency is prohibited from providing the disclosure pursuant to a binding nondisclosure agreement to which the agency is a party, which agreement was executed before June 10, 2016.

A state or local law enforcement agency or governmental agency is not liable for complying with the provisions of this section or participating in an official oral interview with an investigator regarding the candidate.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Files" means all performance reviews, any other files related to job performance, administrative files, grievances, previous personnel applications, personnel-related claims, disciplinary actions, and all complaints, early warnings, and commendations, but does not include nonperformance or conduct-related data, including medical files, schedules, pay and benefit information, or similar administrative data or information.

"State or local law enforcement agency" means:

The Colorado state patrol created pursuant to section 24-33.5-201, C.R.S.;

The Colorado bureau of investigation created pursuant to section 24-33.5-401, C.R.S.;

A county sheriff's office;

A municipal police department;

The division of parks and wildlife within the department of natural resources created pursuant to section 24-1-124, C.R.S.; or

A town marshal's office.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1262), ch. 339, p. 1383, § 3, effective June 10.